Wisconsin, session 2025, AB825.
do enact as follows:AB825,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB825,27Section 2. 20.255 (2) (dq) of the statutes is created to read:AB825,2,9820.255 (2) (dq) Volunteer programs; grants. The amounts in the schedule for 9grants under s. 115.449 for parent and guardian volunteer programs.AB825,310Section 3. 115.449 of the statutes is created to read:AB825,2,1611115.449 Parent and guardian volunteer programs; grants. (1) The 12department shall develop and implement a program to award grants to school 13boards, governing boards of charter schools established under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x), 14and governing bodies of private schools participating in a program under s. 118.60 15or 119.23 to create or support programs that allow or encourage parents and 16guardians to volunteer in elementary and secondary schools.AB825,2,1817(2) The department shall award grants under this section beginning in the 182026-27 school year.AB825,2,1919(3) The department shall promulgate rules to implement this section.AB825,420Section 4. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 21Act 15, is amended to read:AB825,3,322118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. Add the amounts appropriated in the current fiscal year 23under s. 20.255 (2), except s. 20.255 (2) (ac), (aw), (az), (bb), (dj), (dq), (du), (fc), (fm), 24(fp), (fq), (fr), (fu), (k), and (m); and s. 20.505 (4) (es); and the amount, as determined 1by the secretary of administration, of the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (s) 2allocated for payments to telecommunications providers under contracts with 3school districts and cooperative educational service agencies under s. 16.971 (13).AB825,3,44